North Dakota, session 69, HB1370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 39-20-05 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. If the issue to be determined by the hearing concerns license revocation for refusing to
submit to a test under section 39-20-01 or 39-20-14, the hearing must be before a
hearing officer assigned by the director at a time and place designated by the director.
The hearing must be recorded. The scope of a hearing for refusing to submit to a test
under section 39-20-01 may cover only the issues of whether a law enforcement
officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance or,
with respect to a person under twenty-one years of age, the person had been driving
or was in actual physical control of a vehicle while having an alcohol concentration of
at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight; whether the person was placed
under arrest; and whether that person refused to submit to the test or tests. The scope
of a hearing for refusing to submit to a test under section 39-20-14 may cover only the
issues of whether the law enforcement officer had reason to believe the person
committed a moving traffic violation or a violation under section 39 - 08 - 01 or an
equivalent offense, or was involved in a traffic accident as a driver, whether in
conjunction with the violation or the accident the officer has, through the officer's
observations, formulated an opinion that the person's body contains alcohol or other
Page No. 1 25.1010.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
drugs or substances and, whether the person refused to submit to the onsite
screening test.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 39-20-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
39-20-14. Screening tests.
1. Any individual who operates a motor vehicle upon the public highways of this state is
deemed to have given consent to submit to an onsite screening test or tests of the
individual's breath or oral fluid for the purpose of estimating the alcohol concentration
or presence of other drugs in the individual's breath or oral fluid upon the request of a
law enforcement officer who has reason to believe that the individual committed a
moving traffic violation or a violation under section 39-08-01 or an equivalent offense,
or was involved in a traffic accident as a driver, and in conjunction with the violation or
the accident the officer has, through the officer's observations, formulated an opinion
that the individual's body contains alcohol or other drugs.
2. An individual may not be required to submit to a screening test or tests of breath or
oral fluid while at a hospital as a patient if the medical practitioner in immediate charge
of the individual's case is not first notified of the proposal to make the requirement, or
objects to the test or tests on the ground that such would be prejudicial to the proper
care or treatment of the patient.
3. The screening test or tests must be performed by an enforcement officer certified as a
chemical test operator by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director's
designee and according to methods and with devices approved by the director of the
state crime laboratory or the director's designee. The results of such screening test
must be used only for determining whether or not a further test shall be given under
the provisions of section 39-20-01. The officer shall inform the individual that North
Dakota law requires the individual to take the screening test to determine whether the
individual is under the influence of alcohol or other drugs and that refusal of the
individual to submit to a screening test may result in a revocation for at least one
hundred eighty days and up to three years of that individual's driving privileges. If such
individual refuses to submit to such screening test or tests, none may be given, but
such refusal is admissible in a court proceeding if the individual was arrested in
Page No. 2 25.1010.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
violation of section 39-08-01 and did not take any additional chemical tests requested
by the law enforcement officer. Such refusal is sufficient cause to revoke such
individual's license or permit to drive in the same manner as provided in section
39-20-04, and a hearing as provided in section 39-20-05 and a judicial review as
provided in section 39-20-06 must be available.
4. The director mustmay not revoke an individual's driving privileges for refusing to
submit to a screening test requested under this section if the individual provides a
sufficient breath, blood, or urine sample for a chemical test requested under section
39-20-01 for the same incident.
5. No provisions of this section may supersede any provisions of chapter 39-20, nor may
any provision of chapter 39-20 be construed to supersede this section except as
provided herein.
6. For the purposes of this section, "chemical test operator" means an individual certified
by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director's designee as qualified to
perform analysis for alcohol or other drugs in an individual's blood, breath, oral fluid, or
urine.
Page No. 3 25.1010.01000